en: evaporated milk
bg: неподсладено полукондензирано мляко
ca: llet evaporada
de: evaporierte Milch, evaporierte Kondensmilch
es: leche evaporada
eu: Esne lurrundu
fi: Maitotiiviste
fr: lait concentré non sucré
hr: ispareno mlijeko
hu: édesítetlen sűrített tej
id: Susu evaporasi
it: latte evaporato
ja: 無糖練乳
ko: 무당연유
lt: nesaldintas kondensuotas pienas
mk: згуснато млеко
ms: Susu sejat
nl: koffiemelk, geëvaporeerde melk
pt: leite evaporado
sv: indunstad mjölk
th: นมระเหย
zh: 淡奶

en: coffee cream
ca: crema de cafè
da: kaffefløde
de: Kaffeerahm, Kaffeesahne
es: crema de café
fi: kahvikerma
fr: crème à café
hr: vrhnje za kavu
hu: kévékrém, kávétejszín
it: panna da caffè
nl: koffieroom

en: sweetened condensed milk, condensed milk with sugar
bg: подсладено кондензирано мляко
ca: llet condensada ensucrada, llet ensucrada condensada
cs: slazené kondenzované mléko
da: sukret kondenseret mælk
de: gezuckerte Kondensmilch, gezuckerte eingedickte Milch
es: leche condensada azucarada, leche azucarada condensada
et: magustatud kondenspiim
fi: makeutettu kondensoitu maito, makeutettu maitotiiviste, sokeroitu maitotiiviste, sokeroitua maitotiivistettä
fr: lait concentré sucré, lait condensé sucré
hr: ugušćeno zaslađeno mlijeko, kondenzirano zaslađeno mlijeko
hu: édesített sűrített tej, cukrozott sűrített tej
it: latte concentrato zuccherato
lt: saldintas kondensuotas pienas
lv: saldinats iebiezinātais piens
nb: sukkerholdig kondensert melk, sukret kondensert skummet melk, søt kondensert melk
nl: gecondenseerde gesuikerde melk, gesuikerde gecondenseerde melk
pl: mleko zagęszczone słodzone
ro: lapte condensat indulcit
ru: молоко цельное сгущенное с сахаром
sv: sockrad kondenserad mjölk, söt kondenserad mjölk, sötad kondenserad mjölk

en: sweetened condensed skimmed milk
da: sukret kondenseret skummetmælk
et: magustatud kooritud kondenspiim
fi: makeutettu rasvaton maitotiiviste, sokeroitu rasvaton maitotiiviste
fr: lait écrémé concentré sucré
hr: zaslađeno kondenzirano obrano mlijeko
it: latte scremato condensato zuccherato
lt: saldintas sutirštintas nugriebtas pienas
lv: saldināts iebiezināts vājpiens
nl: gesuikerde gecondenseerde halfvolle melk
sv: sockrad kondenserad skummjölk, söt kondenserad skummjölk

en: sweetened condensed semi-skimmed milk
ca: llet desnatada condensada ensucrada, llet descremada condensada ensucrada, llet desnatada ensucrada condensada, llet descremada ensucrada condensada, dolc de llet
da: sockrad kondenserad mjölk
de: gezuckerte Kondensmagermilch, Kondensmagermilch gezuckert
el: ζαχαρούχο συμπυκνωμένο αποβουτυρωμένο γάλα
es: leche desnatada condensada azucarada, leche descremada condensada azucarada, leche desnatada azucarada condensada, leche descremada azucarada condensada
fi: makeutettu tiivistetty vähärasvainen maito
fr: lait écrémé condensé sucré, lait concentré sucré écrémé
hr: zasladeno kondenzirano obrano mlijeko
hu: sűrtett édesített zsírszegény tej, édesített sűrtett zsírszegény tej, cukrozott sűritett sovány tej
it: latte magro condensato zuccherato
nl: gesuikerde gecondenseerde magere melk
pt: leite magro condensado açucarado
ro: lapte degresat condensat indulcit
sl: sladkano kondenzirano posneto mleko

en: sweetened condensed whole milk, Whole condensed milk with sugar
ca: llet sencera condensada ensucrada
da: sockrad kondenserad skummjölk
de: gezuckerte Kondensvollmilch
es: leche entera condensada azucadara
fi: Makeutettu tiivistetty täysmaito
fr: lait entier condensé sucré, lait entier concentré sucré, Lait concentré entier sucré
hr: zaslađeno kondenzirano punomasno mlijeko
hu: édesített sűrített teljes tej
it: latte intero condensato zuccherato
nl: gecondenseerde volle melk met suiker

en: dulce de leche, milk jam
xx: dulce de leche
ar: دولسي دي ليتشه
bn: আঠালো মিঠাই
ca: almívar de llet, confitura de llet, llet confitada
cs: kokosový karamel
eo: laktokaramelo
es: confitura de leche, leche confitada, dulce de leche
fa: دولسه ولتی
fr: confiture de lait
ga: doce de leite
he: ריבת חלב
hy: դուլսե դե լեչե
ja: ドゥルセ・デ・レチェ
ko: 둘세 데 레체
ml: ഡുൾസി ഡെ ലെച്ചെ
nb: hamar pålegg
pa: ਦੂਲਸੇ ਦੇ ਲੇਚੇ
pl: kajmak
ru: дульсе де лече
sq: karamel i qumështit
tr: süt reçeli
uk: дульсе-де-лече
zh: 牛奶焦糖

en: condensed whole milk
ca: llet sencera condensada, llet condensada sencera
de: kondensierte Vollmilch
es: leche entera condensada, leche condensada entera
fi: Tiivistetty täysmaito
fr: lait entier condensé, lait entier concentré
hr: kondenzirano punomasno mlijeko
hu: sűrített teljes tej
it: latte intero condensato
nl: gecondenseerde volle melk

en: lactose and milk proteins
ca: lactosa i proteïnes de la llet, proteïnes de la llet i lactosa
da: Laktose og mælkeprotein
de: Milchzucker und Milcheiweiß, Milchzucker und Milcheiweiss
es: lactosa y proteínas de la leche, proteínas de la leche y lactosa, proteinas de leche
fi: laktoosi- ja maitoproteiini
fr: lactose et protéine de lait, lactose et protéines de lait, protéines de lait et lactose, protéine de lait et lactose
hr: laktozu i mliječne bjelančevine
hu: laktóz és tejfehérje, tejcukor és tejfehérje
it: lattosio e proteine del latte
nl: lactose en melkeiwitten
pl: Białka mleczne i laktoza, białka mleka łącznie z laktozą
pt: lactose e proteínas do leite, lactose e proteínas lácteas

en: milk powder, powdered milk, dry milk
bg: мляко на прах, сухо мляко
ca: Llet en pols
cs: sušené mléko
da: mælkepulver
de: Milchpulver
el: γάλα σε σκόνη
es: Leche en polvo
et: piimapulber
fi: maitojauhe
fr: lait en poudre, poudre de lait
he: אבקת חלב
hr: mlijeko u prahu
hu: tejpor
is: mjólkurduft
it: latte in polvere
ja: 粉乳
ko: 분유
lt: pieniniai milteliai, pieno milteliai
lv: piena pulveris
nb: melkepulver, pulvermelk, tørrmelk
nl: melkpoeder
pl: mleko w proszku
pt: leite em pó
ro: lapte praf
ru: сухое молоко, молоко сухое, сухие молочные продукты
sk: sušené mlieko
sv: mjölkpulver
tr: Süt tozu
uk: сухе молоко
zh: 奶粉

en: Semi-skimmed milk powder
bg: Полуобезмаслено мляко на прах
ca: llet en pols parcialment desnatada, llet parcialment desnatada en pols, llet en pols semidesnatada, llet semidesnatada en pols
es: leche en polvo parcialmente desnatada, leche parcialmente desnatada en polvo, leche en polvo semidesnatada, leche semidesnatada en polvo
fr: lait en poudre demi-écrémé, lait en poudre partiellement écrémé, poudre de lait partiellement écrémé
hr: poluobrano mlijeko u prahu
nl: halfvolle poedermelk
pt: leite meio gordo em pó

en: skimmed milk powder, nonfat dry milk, skimmed cow's milk powder
bg: обезмаслено сухо мляко, обезмаслено мляко на прах, сухо обезмаслено мляко, сухо обезмаслно краве мляко
ca: llet desnatada en pols, llet en pols desnatada
cs: Sušené odstředěné mléko
da: skummetmælkspulver
de: Magermilchpulver, Magermilch-Pulver, Magermilch-Pulver und Magermilch-Konzentrat
es: leche desnatada en polvo, leche en polvo desnatada, leche en polvo descremada
et: lõssipulber, lössipulber, kooritud piimapulber
fi: rasvaton maitojauhe, rasvatonta maitojauhetta, rasvatonmaitojauhe
fr: lait en poudre écrémé, lait écrémé en poudre, poudre de lait écrémé
he: אבקת חלב רזה
hu: sovány tejpor
is: undanrennuduft
it: latte scremato in polvere, latte in polvere scremato
ja: 脱脂粉乳
lt: nugriebto pieno milteliai, lieso pieno milteliai
lv: sausais vajpiena pulveris
nb: skummetmelkepulver, skummetmelkpulver
nl: magere melkpoeder, mageremelkpoeder, mager melkpoeder
pl: chude mleko w proszku, odtłuszczone mleko w proszku, mleko odtłuszczone w proszku, mleko w proszku odtłuszczone
pt: leite magro em pó, leite em pó magro, leite desnatado em po
ro: lapte praf degresat
ru: обезжиренный молоко-порошок, молоко сухое обезжиренное, сухое обезжиренное молоко, молоко обезжиренное сухое, сухое безжиренное молоко, молоко сухое цельное и обезжиренное
sk: sušené odstredené mlieko
sq: qumesht i skremuar pluhur
sv: skummjölkspulver
tr: yağsız süt tozu, kaymağı alınmış süt tozu

en: whole milk powder, dried whole milk, powdered whole milk, whole powdered milk, whole dry milk, dry whole milk
bg: пълномаслено мляко на прах, пълномаслено сухо мляко, сухо пълномаслено мляко
ca: Llet sencera en pols, llet en pols sencera
cs: sušené plnotučné mléko
da: sødmælkspulver
de: Vollmilchpulver, Voll_milch_pulver
el: γάλα Πλήρες σε σκόνη
es: leche entera en polvo, leche en polvo entera
et: täispiimapulber, koorimata piimapulber
fi: täysmaitojauhe, kuivattu täysmaito, täysmaitojauhetta, rasvainen maitojauhe
fr: lait entier en poudre, poudre de lait entier, lait en poudre entier
he: אבקת חלב מלא, חלב מלא מיובש, חלב מלא יבש
hu: zsiros tejpor, teljes tejpor
is: nýmjólkurduft
it: latte intero in polvere
ja: 全粉乳
lt: nenugriebto pieno milteliai
lv: pilnpiena pulveris
nb: helmelkpulver, helmelk pulver
nl: volle melkpoeder, vollemelkpoeder
pl: pelne mleko w proszku, pełne mleko w proszku, mleko pełne w proszku, mleko w proszku pełne
pt: leite entero em pó, leite em pó gordo, leite integral em pó, leite gordo em pó
ro: lapte praf integral
ru: цельное сухое молоко, сухое цельное молоко, молоко сухое цельное
sk: sušené plnotučné mlieko
sq: qumesht pluhur gjithë
sv: helmjölkspulver, fetthaltigt mjölkpulver, sötmjölkspulver

en: milk coating
hr: mliječni preljev
it: rivestimento al latte

en: milk preparation
hr: mliječni pripravak
it: preparazione del latte

en: pasteurized milk and cream
ca: llet i nata pasteuritzats, llet i crema pasteuritzats
de: pasteurisiert Milch und Rahm
es: Leche y nata pasteurizadas, Leche y crema pasteurizadas
fi: pastöroitu maito ja kerma
fr: lait et crème pasteurisé
hr: pasterizirano mlijeko i vrhnje
hu: pasztőrözött tej és tejszín
it: latte e panna pastorizzati
nl: Gepasteuriseerde melk en room
pt: Leite e natas pateurizados
sv: pastöriserad mjölk och grädde

en: disaccharide
bg: дизахарид
ca: disacàrid
de: disaccharid
es: disacárido
fi: disakkaridi
fr: disaccharide, diholoside
hr: disaharid
hu: diszacharid
it: disaccaridi
lv: disaharīds
nl: disaccharide
pl: disacharydy

en: isomaltulose
bg: изомалтулоза
ca: isomaltulosa
cs: Isomaltulóza
de: Isomaltulose
es: Isomaltulosa
fa: ایزومالتیوس
fi: isomaltuloosi
fr: Isomaltulose
he: איזומלטולוז
hr: izomaltuloza, isomaltulose-palatinose, izomaltuloza-palatinoza
hu: izomaltulóz
id: Isomaltulosa
it: isomaltulosio
ja: パラチノース
nl: Isomaltulose
pl: Izomaltuloza
sh: Izomaltuloza
sr: Izomaltuloza
zh: 异麦芽酮糖

en: lactose, milk sugar, milk lactose
ar: لاكتوز
be: Лактоза
bg: Лактоза, млечна захар
bn: ল্যাকটোজ
bs: Laktoza
ca: Lactosa
cs: Laktóza, laktózy
cy: Lactos
da: laktose, mælkesukker
de: Lactose, Milchzucker, Laktose
el: Λακτόζη, λακτόζης
eo: Laktozo, laktosukero
es: Lactosa
et: Laktoos, piimasuhkur
eu: Laktosa
fa: لاکتوز
fi: Laktoosi, maitosokeri
fr: Lactose, sucre du lait
ga: Lachtós
gl: Lactosa
he: לקטוז
hr: laktoza, laktoze, mliječni šećer
hu: Laktóz, tejcukor
hy: Լակտոզ
ia: Lactosa
id: Laktosa
is: Laktósi, mjólkursykur
it: Lattosio
ja: ラクトース, 乳糖
ka: ლაქტოზა
ko: 락토스
ky: Лактоза
la: Lactosum
lt: Laktozė, laktozę
lv: Laktoze, laktozi
mg: Laktôzy
mk: Лактоза
ms: Laktosa
mt: lattosju
nb: Laktose, melkesukker
nl: Lactose, melksuiker
nn: Laktose, mjølkesukker
oc: Lactòsa
pl: Laktoza, laktozą, laktozę, laktozy, laktoza z mleka
pt: Lactose, lactéos
ro: Lactoză, lactoza
ru: Лактоза
sh: Laktoza
sk: Laktóza, laktózy
sl: Laktoza, mlečni sladkor
sq: Laktoza
sr: Лактоза
su: Laktosa
sv: Laktos, mjölksocker
ta: லாக்டோசு
th: แล็กโทส
tr: Laktoz
uk: Лактоза
uz: Laktoza
vi: Lactose
zh: 乳糖

en: milk minerals
ca: minerals de la llet
de: Milchmineralien
es: minerales de la leche
fi: maidon kivennäisaine, maidon kivennäisaineet
fr: minéraux du lait
hr: minerali mlijeka
hu: tejből kivont ásványi anyagok, ásványi anyagok tejből
it: minerali del latte
nl: melkmineralen
ro: minerale din lapte